District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0136.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Special Election in the Office of Delegate Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 10(d)(2) of the District of Columbia Election Code of 1955, approved
August 12, 1955 (69 Stat. 702, D.C. Official Code § 1-1001.10(d)(2)), is amended by adding a
new subparagraph (C) to read as follows:
“(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph and
any other provision of District law, in extraordinary circumstances, as defined in section
26(b)(4)(A) of the Revised Statutes of the United States (2 U.S.C. § 8(b)(4)(A)), a vacancy in the
office of Delegate shall be filled in accordance with section 26(b) of the Revised Statutes of the
United States (2 U.S.C. § 8(b)).”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of Congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code §1-206.02(c)(l)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2